Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
CHAPTER 227 Fire Prevention and Protection

227.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

227.020.
Division to enforce fire prevention laws of state and political subdivisions. [Repealed.]

227.030.
Duties of director. [Repealed.]

227.040.
Division has jurisdiction over all buildings — Powers of director and assistants to inspect. [Repealed.]

227.050.
Director may conduct examinations — Powers. [Repealed.]

227.060.
Director may prescribe orders and standards for safety of buildings. [Repealed.]

227.070.
Notice of time and place for hearing, prior to making general orders. [Repealed.]

227.080.
Record of orders — Admissible in evidence — Presumption of validity. [Repealed.]

227.090.
Director to keep record of fires and investigations. [Repealed.]

227.100.
Director may conduct fire prevention educational campaign. [Repealed.]

227.110.
City fire chiefs and sheriffs are deputies when so ordered by director — Instructions to assistants. [Repealed.]

227.120.
Deputies to investigate and report fires. [Repealed.]

227.130.
Director to request prosecutions — Attorney-General to assist. [Repealed.]

227.140.
Fire chiefs to inspect places periodically — Reports furnished to rating bureaus. [Repealed.]

227.150.
Fire chief may order fire hazard removed. [Repealed.]

227.160.
Officer may remove fire hazard when owner fails. [Repealed.]

227.170.
Local authorities to retain power — Orders fix minimum standards. [Repealed.]

227.180.
Owner to keep building safe from fire — Public and employes to be kept out of unsafe places. [Repealed.]

227.190.
Motion picture machines to be equipped with safety devices. [Repealed.]